Alaska statutes. Title 8. Business and Professions.
Article 2. The Board of Governors and Officers.

Sec. 08.08.030.
Governance of the Alaska Bar.

The Alaska Bar is governed by the Board of Governors of the Alaska Bar.
The board has the powers and duties conferred by this chapter and by the Alaska Bar Rules.
Members of the board do not receive a salary.

History.

(§ 6 ch 196 SLA 1955; am § 3 ch 181 SLA 1976)

Sec. 08.08.040.
Board of Governors of the Alaska Bar.

There is created a Board of Governors of the Alaska Bar to be elected under bylaws and regulations adopted by the board.

The board consists of nine active members elected by the active members of the Alaska Bar and three persons appointed by the governor who are not attorneys.

History.

(§ 5 ch 196 SLA 1955; am § 1 ch 178 SLA 1960; am § 4 ch 181 SLA 1976; am § 2 ch 52 SLA 1981)

Sec. 08.08.050.
Selection of the board.

Two members of the board shall be elected by and from among the members of the association resident in the first judicial district; four members of the board shall be elected by and from among the members of the association resident in the third judicial district; two members by and from among the members of the association resident in the combined area of the second and fourth judicial districts; and one member of the board shall be elected at large by and from among the members of the association residing in the entire state. Three members who are not attorneys shall be appointed by the governor and are subject to confirmation by the legislature in joint session.

Members of the Board of Governors shall hold office for three years and until their successors are elected or appointed and qualified.

Four board members shall be selected on the following triennial rotation:

in the first year, one member from the first judicial district, one member from the combined area of the second and fourth judicial districts, one member from the third judicial district, and one appointed member;

in the second year, one member at large, two members from the third judicial district, and one appointed member; and

in the third year, one member from the combined area of the second and fourth judicial districts, one member from the third judicial district, one member from the first judicial district, and one appointed member.

History.

(§ 5 ch 196 SLA 1955; am § 1 ch 178 SLA 1960; am §§ 1, 2 ch 9 SLA 1971; am §§ 3 — 5 ch 52 SLA 1981; am § 2 ch 31 SLA 2013)

Sec. 08.08.060.
Election of officers.

The active members of the Alaska Bar who are in actual attendance at the association’s annual convention shall elect by a majority vote during the convention the association’s officers from the membership of the Board of Governors.

History.

(§ 5 ch 196 SLA 1955; am § 1 ch 178 SLA 1960)

Sec. 08.08.070.
Vacancies on the board.

The board shall fill a vacancy in the elected membership of the board until the next annual election.

The governor shall appoint a member to fill a vacancy in the appointed membership of the board for the unexpired term.

History.

(§ 5 ch 196 SLA 1955; am § 1 ch 178 SLA 1960; am § 6 ch 52 SLA 1981)

Sec. 08.08.075.
Meetings of the board.

AS

44.62.310

—

44.62.319

(Open Meetings Act) apply to the meetings of the board.
Members of the Alaska Bar and the public shall be given 30 days’ notice of meetings of the board except for emergency meetings.
Meetings of the board shall take place in the state.

History.

(§ 7 ch 52 SLA 1981)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2010, “AS

44.62.310

—

44.62.319

(Open Meetings Act)” was substituted for “AS

44.62.310

and

44.62.312

” in accordance with § 29(1), ch. 58, SLA 2010.

Sec. 08.08.080.
Powers of board.

Except as may be otherwise provided in this chapter or the Alaska Bar Rules, the board may approve and recommend to the state supreme court rules

concerning admission, discipline, licensing, continuing legal education, and defining the practice of law;

providing for continuing legal education and for certification of a continuing legal education program;

establishing a program for the certification of attorneys as specialists.

The board may adopt bylaws and regulations consistent with this chapter and the Alaska Bar Rules

concerning membership and the classification of membership in the Alaska Bar;

fixing the annual membership fees;

concerning annual and special meetings.

Consistent with this chapter and the Alaska Bar Rules, the board may

provide for employees of the Alaska Bar, the time, place and method of their selection, and their respective powers, duties, terms of office, and compensation;

establish, collect, deposit, invest, and disburse membership and admission fees, penalties, and other funds;

sue in the name of the Alaska Bar in a court of competent jurisdiction to enjoin a person from doing an act constituting a violation of this chapter;

provide for all other matters affecting in any way the organization and functioning of the Alaska Bar.

History.

(§ 7 ch 196 SLA 1955; am §§ 2, 3 ch 178 SLA 1960; am § 5 ch 181 SLA 1976; am § 8 ch 52 SLA 1981)

Sec. 08.08.082.
Continuing legal education for board members.

A member of the Board of Governors each year shall complete the mandatory ethics continuing legal education requirements and the voluntary continuing legal education requirements set out in the Alaska Bar Rules.

History.

(§ 3 ch 31 SLA 2013)

Effective dates. —

Section 4, ch. 31, SLA 2013 makes this section effective June 4, 2013, in accordance with AS

01.10.070(c)

.

Legislative history reports. —

For House letter of intent on ch. 31, SLA 2013, which enacted this section, see 2013 House Journal 1006, 1069.

Sec. 08.08.085.
Annual report.

The Board of Governors shall annually prepare a report on all matters concerning admissions, discipline of members, and disbarment proceedings, except for those matters defined as confidential by court rule, and notify the legislature that the report is available.

The annual report of the Board of Governors must note each addition, modification, or repeal of

a bylaw or regulation of the Alaska Bar;

the Alaska Bar Rules proposed to or adopted by the state supreme court.

The annual report of the Board of Governors may recommend to the legislature changes to this chapter and to the provisions of state law generally.

History.

(§ 6 ch 181 SLA 1976; am § 9 ch 52 SLA 1981; am § 3 ch 21 SLA 1995)

Sec. 08.08.090.
Power of the bar to make or change bylaws and regulations.

A bylaw or regulation adopted by the Board of Governors may be modified or rescinded, or a new bylaw or regulation may be adopted, by a vote of the active members of the association under bylaws and regulations to be adopted by the Board of Governors.

History.

(§ 7 ch 196 SLA 1955; am § 3 ch 168 SLA 1960; am § 7 ch 181 SLA 1976)

Sec. 08.08.100.
Administrative Procedure Act.

The bylaws and regulations adopted by the board or the members of the Alaska Bar under this chapter are not subject to AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act).

History.

(§ 7 ch 196 SLA 1955; am § 3 ch 178 SLA 1960; am § 8 ch 181 SLA 1976)

Secs. 08.08.110 — 08.08.120.
Admission, suspension and disbarment; disqualification to hear disciplinary matters. [Repealed, § 11 ch 181 SLA 1976.]